Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1855
Banded rates; commission; powers.

The commission may authorize, consistent with general regulatory principles, including, but not limited to (1) banded rates with a minimum and maximum rate that allows the jurisdictional utility to offer ratepayers rates within the rate band for the purpose of attracting additional natural gas service demand or to retain such demand, (2) mechanisms for the determination of rates by negotiation, and (3) customer choice and other programs to be offered by a natural gas public utility to unbundle one or more elements of the service provided by the utility.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 55.